California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding Section 41206.01, the process for certifying the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2016–17 fiscal year shall follow the process set forth below:

(a) No later than July 6, 2018, the Superintendent shall provide the Director of Finance the latest available school enrollment data, allocated local proceeds of taxes received by school districts, apportionment data calculated and the related funding allocated pursuant to Section 14002, and all other final allocations of funds provided to school districts for the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(b) No later
 than July 6, 2018, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the Director of Finance final community college enrollment data, allocated local proceeds of taxes received by community college districts, and final allocations of all funds provided to community college districts for the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(c) No later than July 11, 2018, and based on the data provided by the Superintendent and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), and on the Department of Finance’s final projection of 2016–17 fiscal year General Fund revenues included in the 2018 May Revision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13308 of the Government Code, the Director of Finance shall recalculate the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the
 2016-17 fiscal year. As part of recalculating the minimum funding obligation, the Director of Finance shall make the supporting data used to make the calculation available on the Department of Finance’s Internet Web site, including the percentage for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, whether paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is applicable, the creation or restoration of the maintenance factor, school and community college enrollment, General Fund revenues, changes in per capita personal income, changes in per capita General Fund revenues, and property taxes.

(d) The Superintendent, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and interested parties shall submit any comments on the Department of Finance’s proposed calculations and published data for the 2016–17 fiscal year to the Director of
 Finance and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by no later than August 1, 2018.

(e) The Director of Finance shall review any comments directed at the proposed Proposition 98 certification. Comments not directed at the proposed Proposition 98 certification shall be considered irrelevant and shall not be responded to by the Director of Finance. The Director of Finance shall accept or reject any timely relevant comments. If the Director of Finance accepts a comment, the Director of Finance shall include a written explanation of how the proposed Proposition 98 certification addresses or accommodates the comment. If the Director of Finance rejects a comment, the Director of Finance shall include a written explanation of the reason for the rejection of the comment. These comments and the Director of Finance’s response to the comments shall be provided to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and published on the
 Department of Finance’s Internet Web site by no later than August 15, 2018. The Legislature shall consider the comments and responses, may hold public hearings as necessary, and shall provide any additional written comments to the Director of Finance no later than August 31, 2018. The Director of Finance shall take into consideration any comments provided by the Legislature and issue a final certification of the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2016–17 fiscal year, no later than September 15, 2018. This information shall be published on the Department of Finance’s Internet Web site by the same date. The final certification, including the underlying data and calculations, shall also be published in a separate schedule of the Governor’s Budget submitted to the Legislature by no later than January 10, 2019.

(f) Any judicial action to challenge, review, set aside, void, or annul the Director of Finance’s final certification of the state’s minimum funding obligation pursuant to subdivision (e) must be filed no later than the 90th day following issuance of the certification. That action shall be given precedence on the court’s docket. The filing of that action shall not stay the appropriation or allocation of any sums deemed by the Director of Finance to be due pursuant to Section 41206.03.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 39, Sec. 10.   (AB 1825)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.03.

(a) Pursuant to the implementing legislation of Proposition 98, for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, appropriations for deficiencies or prior year adjustments shall be deemed to be appropriations in the fiscal year in which the deficiencies or prior year adjustments occurred, unless otherwise provided by law.

(b) If the Director of Finance determines, pursuant to the certification process established in Sections 41206.01 and 41206.02, that the state has applied moneys for the support of school districts and community college districts in an amount that exceeds the minimum amount required pursuant to Section 8 of Article
 XVI of the California Constitution for the fiscal year being certified, the excess moneys shall be credited to the fiscal year being certified.

 (c) If there remains an outstanding balance in the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the fiscal year being certified, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the amounts necessary to satisfy that obligation are hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Controller, without regard to fiscal years, for purposes of this subdivision. By no later than September 1 of each year, the Director of Finance shall provide in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a schedule for the
 allocation of the outstanding balance. By no later than October 1 of each year, the Director of Finance shall provide to the Controller a schedule for the allocation of the outstanding balance pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13308 of the Government Code. The Controller shall allocate the outstanding balance based on the schedule provided to the Controller by the Director of Finance, unless an alternative plan for repayment of the outstanding obligation has already been adopted as part of the annual budget process, or is enacted in statute by no later than August 31. The plan set forth by the Director of Finance pursuant to this subdivision shall be published on the Department of Finance’s internet website. The outstanding obligation shall be allocated as follows:

(1) To school districts 89.07 percent in proportion to the enrollment in school districts as determined for purposes of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) To community college districts 10.93 percent in proportion to the enrollment in community college districts as determined for purposes of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 52, Sec. 3.   (SB 76)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.04.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The calculation of the state’s minimum funding obligation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution must be based upon actual tax revenue data when it is available.

(B) Due to winter storms in early 2023, the United States Internal Revenue Service extended the tax filing deadlines for the 2022 tax year to November 16, 2023, for over 99 percent of California taxpayers. The Franchise Tax Board conformed to this action and extended the state income and corporate tax filing deadlines to November 16, 2023. Because of these extensions, the Legislature did not have
 actual 2022 tax revenue data at the time the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) was enacted upon which to determine the accurate state minimum funding obligation for the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(C) Due to the lack of actual tax revenue data, the minimum funding obligation for the 2022–23 fiscal year funded in the Budget Act of 2023 was in total six billion one hundred ninety-two million nine hundred twenty-nine thousand dollars ($6,192,929,000) over the minimum funding obligation computed with actual tax revenue data.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(A) Provide a methodology in this section to account for the costs identified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(B) Reflect the minimum funding
 obligation to school districts and community colleges pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the 2023–24 fiscal year.

(C) Provide a methodology to keep future fiscal years open for the purpose of computing the minimum funding obligation in any fiscal year in which a significant proportion of actual tax revenue data is not available before May 1 due to extraordinary personal and corporate tax filing extensions, without reducing school funding already allocated in an impacted fiscal year.

(b) (1) For purposes of Section 41206.03, five billion four hundred twenty-two million one hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($5,422,143,000) allocated in the 2022–23 fiscal year to support school district and charter school local control funding formula apportionments pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03 and the associated warrants
 issued pursuant to Section 14041 shall be considered excess moneys credited to the 2022–23 fiscal year only for the purposes of determining the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) For purposes of Section 41206.03, seven hundred seventy million seven hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($770,786,000) allocated in the 2022–23 fiscal year to support community college student centered funding formula apportionments pursuant to Section 84750.4 and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 84320 shall be considered excess moneys credited to the 2022–23 fiscal year only for the purposes of determining the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the
 California Constitution.

(c) (1) (A) (i) In the 2028–29 fiscal year, and annually for 11 fiscal years thereafter through the 2039–40 fiscal year, four hundred thirty-seven million seven hundred sixty-nine thousand dollars ($437,769,000) of the amount described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes, pursuant to Section 12460 of the Government Code, as an allocation from the General Fund to the Superintendent for local
 control funding formula entitlements attributable to the 2022–23 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03, and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 14041, in the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(ii) In the
 2040–41 fiscal year, one hundred sixty-eight million nine hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($168,915,000) of the amount described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes, pursuant to Section 12460 of the Government Code, as an allocation from the General Fund to the Superintendent for local control funding formula entitlements attributable to the 2022–23 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03, and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 14041, in the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(B) (i) In the 2028–29 fiscal year, and annually for 11 fiscal years thereafter through the
 2039–40 fiscal year, sixty-two million two hundred thirty-one thousand dollars ($62,231,000) of the amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes, pursuant to Section 12460 of the Government Code, as an allocation from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to support student centered funding formula entitlements attributable to the 2022–23 fiscal year pursuant to Section 84750.4, and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 84320, in the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(ii) In the 2040–41 fiscal year, twenty-four million fourteen thousand dollars ($24,014,000) of the amount described in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes, pursuant to Section 12460 of the Government Code, as an allocation from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to support student centered funding formula entitlements attributable to the 2022–23 fiscal year pursuant to Section 84750.4, and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 84320, in the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(2) Paragraph (1) requires only that the specified portions of the allocations made in the 2022–23 fiscal year be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes in the specified fiscal years, and nothing in paragraph (1) shall be interpreted to make new appropriations of those amounts described in paragraph (1) in the specified fiscal years.

(3) The recognition of the amounts described in paragraph (1) for
 budgetary and financial reporting purposes shall not be credited as General Fund revenues appropriated to school districts and community colleges to meet the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the fiscal year in which the recognition occurs and shall not be included in the total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution in the fiscal year in which the recognition occurs.

(d) (1) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, this subdivision applies to any fiscal year in which California personal and corporate income tax filing deadlines are extended to conform with filing extensions announced by the United States Internal Revenue Service,
 which result in the delay of personal and corporate tax revenue collection until after May 1 in counties that in total contributed more than 50 percent of the state’s total personal and corporate tax revenue in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year impacted by the tax filing extension.

(2) For any impacted fiscal year for which this subdivision applies pursuant to paragraph (1), the Director of Finance shall, for purposes of Sections 41206.01 and 41206.03, consider the applicable fiscal year to be open until actual tax revenue data is available but no later than January 10 of the subsequent fiscal year. Upon actual tax revenue data being available or the January 10 deadline having passed, whichever occurs first, the Director of Finance shall subtract the total appropriations made to meet the state’s estimated minimum funding obligation for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to subdivision
 (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the impacted fiscal year from the minimum funding obligation for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution calculated with actual tax revenue data for the impacted fiscal year.

(3) If the difference calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) is negative, meaning the total appropriations made to meet the estimated minimum funding obligation for the support of school districts and community college districts in the impacted fiscal year exceeded the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts calculated with actual tax revenue data for the impacted fiscal year, all of the following apply:

(A) The difference shall not be considered General Fund revenues appropriated to school
 districts and community colleges to meet the state’s minimum funding obligation pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the impacted fiscal year in which the allocations were made.

(B) The difference shall not be included in the total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution made in the impacted fiscal year in which the allocation is made for purposes of calculating the state’s minimum funding obligation pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the subsequent fiscal year.

(C) The difference shall not be considered excess moneys credited to the fiscal year certified pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41206.03.

(4) Of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2), the Department of Finance shall determine the respective amounts that are not to be considered General Fund appropriations to school districts and community colleges to meet the state’s minimum funding obligation pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and that shall be attributable to (A) local control funding formula entitlements pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03 and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 14041 for the impacted fiscal year and (B) student centered funding formula entitlements pursuant to Section 84750.4 and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 84320 for the impacted fiscal year.

(5) (A) If the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) is negative, in the third fiscal year following the impacted fiscal year, and annually for nine fiscal years immediately thereafter, 10
 equal shares of the amounts calculated by the Department of Finance pursuant to paragraph (4) shall be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes, pursuant to Section 12460 of the Government Code, as an allocation from the General Fund to both of the following:

(i) The Superintendent, to support local control funding formula entitlements pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03, and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 14041, for the applicable fiscal year, in an amount equal to 89.07 percent of the total calculated pursuant to paragraph (2).

(ii) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, to support student centered funding formula entitlements pursuant to Section 84750.4, and the associated warrants issued pursuant to Section 84320, for the applicable fiscal year, in an amount equal to 10.93 percent of the total calculated
 pursuant to paragraph (2).

(B) Subparagraph (A) requires only that the specified portions of the allocations made in the impacted fiscal year be recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes in the specified fiscal years, and nothing in subparagraph (A) shall be interpreted to make new appropriations of the amounts described in subparagraph (A) in the specified fiscal years.

(6) The recognition of the amounts described in paragraph (5) for budgetary and financial reporting purposes shall not be considered General Fund revenues appropriated to school districts and community colleges to meet the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the fiscal year in which the recognition occurs and shall not be included in the total allocations to school districts and
 community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution in the fiscal year in which the recognition occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 47.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.1.

Pursuant to Section 41206, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Controller shall ensure that the General Fund appropriations transferred to Sections A and B of the State School Fund include adjustments reflected in the amounts finally certified by the superintendent or the chancellor, respectively, at the annual certification of apportionments pursuant to Sections 41336, 41341, and 84320, for purposes of determining appropriations and allocations pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 10.7.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.5.

For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB and allocated local proceeds of taxes” for any fiscal year shall include any revenues that are allocated to school districts and community college districts, as a result of the determination, pursuant to the two-year calculation set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, that their allocation would not result in an appropriation by the state in compliance with Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 41206, by January 1, 2006, the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Director of Finance shall jointly determine the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 1995–96 to 2003–04 fiscal years, inclusive. The Director of Finance shall notify the Governor and Legislature of the amount of the outstanding balance for each fiscal year between the 1995–96 and 2003–04 fiscal years, inclusive, and the total amount of the outstanding balance for those years. This notification does not constitute a certification for purposes of Section 41206.

(b) If the joint determination required pursuant to subdivision (a) is not made for any fiscal year by January 1, 2006, the Controller shall make the determination for that fiscal year or years and shall notify the Governor and Legislature of that determination on or before March 1, 2006. This notification does not constitute a certification for purposes of Section 41206.

(c) For purposes of this section, the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for a fiscal year is the amount, if any, by which the amount required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, including any maintenance factor that should have been allocated in that fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI, exceeds the amount applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts for that fiscal year.

(d) Commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) is hereby annually appropriated from the General Fund to the Controller for allocation to school districts and community college districts for the purpose of discharging in full the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution identified in subdivision (a) or (b) of this section. This annual appropriation shall continue until the Director of Finance reports to the Legislature that the sum of appropriations made and allocated pursuant to this subdivision equals the total outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable.

(1) The amount annually appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts in a manner that reflects the proportion of regular average daily attendance in school districts, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 41209, to funded full-time equivalent students in community college districts, as those numbers are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which funds are to be received.

(2) The Controller shall allocate funds annually appropriated pursuant to this subdivision to school districts and community college districts based on attendance information provided by the department and Chancellor of the California Community Colleges on August 15 of each year commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year, unless otherwise provided by the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (g). For purposes of this subdivision a school district includes a county office of education and a charter school.

(e) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amounts appropriated and allocated pursuant to this section shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 1995–96 to 2003–04 fiscal years, inclusive, in chronological order beginning with the 1995–96 fiscal year and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in the fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred. When the amount determined to be owed for each fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) is fully appropriated and allocated pursuant to subdivision (d), the data used in the computations made under subdivision (a) or (b) and the total amount owed by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for that fiscal year, including as much of the maintenance factor for that fiscal year determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8 of Article XVI as has been allocated as required by subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI by virtue of the payments made under this section, shall be deemed certified for purposes of Section 41206.

(f) Funding received by school districts and community college districts pursuant to this section shall first be deemed to be paid in satisfaction of any outstanding claims pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs for any fiscal year. Notwithstanding any amounts that are deemed, pursuant to this subdivision, to be paid in satisfaction of outstanding claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs, the Controller may audit any claim as allowed by law and may reduce any amount owed by a local educational agency pursuant to an audit by reducing amounts owed for any other mandate claims. The Controller shall apply amounts received by each school district or community college district against any balances of unpaid claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs and interest in chronological order beginning with the earliest claim. The Controller shall report to each local educational agency the amounts of any claims and interest that are offset from funds provided pursuant to this section and shall report a summary of the amounts offset for each mandate for each fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of the Legislature. The governing board of a school district or community college district may expend funds received pursuant to this section in excess of amounts offsetting mandate claims for any other one-time purposes, as determined by the governing board.

(g) The Legislature may specify in the annual Budget Act or other statute other one-time purposes for which the funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be used so long as those appropriations are made for allocation to school districts or community college districts.

(History: Repealed (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 216, Sec. 6.   Effective August 11, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 41206, the minimum state educational funding guarantee for school districts and community college districts for the 2004–05 fiscal year, as determined pursuant to Chapter 213 of the Statutes of 2004, is forty-eight billion six hundred seventy-five million six hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($48,675,674,000), creating an outstanding balance of one billion six hundred twenty million nine hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars ($1,620,928,000). The outstanding balance shall be appropriated and allocated pursuant to Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 52055.700) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 41206, the outstanding balance of the minimum state educational funding requirement for school districts and community college districts required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the 2005–06 fiscal year shall be determined using actual data agreed to by the Superintendent and the Director of Finance no later than January 31, 2008. The Director of Finance shall provide a written notification to the Legislature within one month after completion of the determination, detailing the data of the determination. The outstanding balance shall be appropriated and allocated pursuant to Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 52055.700) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28.

(c) When the amount determined to be owed for the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) is fully appropriated and allocated pursuant to Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 52055.700) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28, the data used in the computations made under subdivisions (a) and (b) and the total amount owed by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and Chapter 213 of the Statutes of 2004 for those fiscal years, including as much of the maintenance factor for those fiscal years determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8 of Article XVI as has been allocated as required by subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI by virtue of the payments made under this section, shall be deemed certified for purposes of Section 41206.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 41203.5 and 41206 and any other provision of law, the minimum funding obligation for school districts and community college districts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2008–09 fiscal year is forty-nine billion one hundred two million forty-one thousand dollars ($49,102,041,000). The maintenance factor created pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2008–09 fiscal year, together with the balances of maintenance factor obligations for prior fiscal years that are unpaid as of June 30, 2009, totals eleven billion two hundred twelve million nine hundred nine thousand dollars ($11,212,909,000). The maintenance factor shall be appropriated and allocated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) For the 2009–10 fiscal year, computations of funding obligations pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution shall be based on the amount of the minimum funding guarantee for the 2008–09 fiscal year, and the amount of the maintenance factor obligation set forth in subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) The computations required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for a fiscal year shall be performed prior to, and separately from, the computation of the maintenance factor allocation identified in subdivision (a) of this section and required by subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Sec. 7 of Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.25.

(a) If the Superintendent and the Director of Finance jointly determine that, for the 2008–09 fiscal year, the state has applied moneys for the support of school districts and community college districts in an amount that exceeds the minimum amount required for that fiscal year pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the excess, up to one billion one hundred million five hundred ninety thousand dollars ($1,100,590,000), shall be deemed, as of June 30 of that fiscal year, a payment in satisfaction of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation under that section for the 2002–03 and 2003–04 fiscal years in accordance with the following:

(1) The first four hundred eighty-three million sixteen thousand dollars ($483,016,000) in payment of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation for the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(2) The next six hundred seventeen million five hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($617,574,000) in payment of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation for the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(b) For purposes of this section, the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for a fiscal year is the amount, if any, by which the amount required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, including any maintenance factor that
 should have been allocated in that fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, exceeds the amount applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts for that fiscal year.

(c) The amounts allocated pursuant to this section shall be deemed, for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, to be appropriations made and allocated in the fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred. When the amount determined to be owed for each such fiscal year is fully allocated pursuant to this subdivision, the data used in the computations made under this section with regard to the total amount owed by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for that fiscal year, including as much of the maintenance
 factor for that fiscal year determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution as has been allocated as required by subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution by virtue of the allocations made under this section, shall be deemed certified for purposes of Section 41206.

(d) The amount described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed a payment in full satisfaction of the amounts owed pursuant to Section 41207.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 41207.3 (as added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 79.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 41206, the minimum state educational funding obligation for school districts and community college districts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is determined to be the following:

(1) Fifty-three billion three hundred forty-five million four hundred twenty thousand dollars ($53,345,420,000) for the 2005–06 fiscal year, with an outstanding balance of one billion one hundred ten million five hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($1,110,516,000). The outstanding balance is appropriated and allocated pursuant to Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 52055.700) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4.

(2) Fifty-five billion two hundred fifty-one million two hundred sixty-six thousand dollars ($55,251,266,000) for the 2006–07 fiscal year, with an outstanding balance of two hundred eleven million five hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($211,533,000). The outstanding balance is appropriated and allocated pursuant to Section 41207.41.

(3) Fifty-six billion five hundred seventy-seven million four hundred ninety-one thousand dollars ($56,577,491,000) for the 2007–08 fiscal year, with no outstanding balance.

(b) (1) The amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed certified for purposes of Section 41206 when the conditions set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 41207.1 are met.

(2) The amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a)
 shall be deemed certified for purposes of Section 41206 upon appropriation of the full amount of the outstanding balance determined for that year.

(3) The amount determined pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is deemed to be certified for purposes of Section 41206 upon enactment of this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 20.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.31.

The Director of Finance shall, based on the data provided by the Superintendent and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, certify the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for fiscal years 2009–10 to 2015–16, inclusive, no later than July 11, 2018. The certification for fiscal years 2009–10 to 2015–16, inclusive, shall be subject to subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, of Section 41206.02, including, among other things, that the Director of Finance shall issue a final certification of the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the fiscal years 2009–10 to 2015–16,
 inclusive, no later than September 15, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 39, Sec. 12.   (AB 1825)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.4.
